District of Columbia statutes.
28:5-119

Savings clause.

A transaction arising out of or associated with a letter of credit that was issued before the effective date of this article and the rights, obligations, and interests flowing from that transaction are governed by any statute or other law amended or repealed by this article as if repeal or amendment had not occurred and may be terminated, completed, consummated, or enforced under that statute or other law.

History

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-238, § 2, 44 DCR 923

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 28:5-119.